North Dakota statutes. TITLE 44 Offices and Officers
CHAPTER 44-06.1 Revised Uniform Law on Notarial Acts

44-06.1-01.
Definitions.

As provided in this chapter:

“Acknowledgment” means a declaration by an individual before a notarial officer that the individual has signed a record for the purpose stated in the record and, if the record is signed in a representative capacity, that the individual signed the record with proper authority and signed it as the act of the individual or person identified in the record.

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

“Electronic signature” means an electronic symbol, sound, or process attached to or logically associated with a record and executed or adopted by an individual with the intent to sign the record.

“In a representative capacity” means acting as:

An authorized officer, agent, partner, trustee, or other representative for a person other than an individual;

A public officer, personal representative, guardian, or other representative, in the capacity stated in a record;

An agent or attorney in fact for a principal; or

An authorized representative of another in any other capacity.

“Notarial act” means an act, whether performed with respect to a tangible or electronic record, that a notarial officer may perform under the law of this state. The term includes taking an acknowledgment, administering an oath or affirmation, taking a verification on oath or affirmation, witnessing or attesting a signature, certifying or attesting a copy except as provided in subsection 7 of section 44-06.1-23, and noting a protest of a negotiable instrument.

“Notarial officer” means a notary public or other individual authorized to perform a notarial act.

“Notary public” means an individual commissioned to perform a notarial act by the secretary of state.

“Official stamp” means a physical image affixed to a tangible record or an electronic image attached to or logically associated with an electronic record.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, statutory trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Sign” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.

“Signature” means a tangible symbol or an electronic signature that evidences the signing of a record.

“Stamping device” means:

A physical device capable of affixing to a tangible record an official stamp; or

An electronic device or process capable of attaching to or logically associating with an electronic record an official stamp.

“Verification on oath or affirmation” means a declaration, made by an individual on oath or affirmation before a notarial officer, that a statement in a record is true.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3; 2017, ch. 313, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 376, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

Collateral References.

Measure of damages for false or incomplete certificate by notary public, 13 A.L.R.3d 1039.

Disqualification of attorney, otherwise qualified, to take oath or acknowledgment from client, 21 A.L.R.3d 483.

Liability of notary public or his bond for negligence in performance of duties, 44 A.L.R.3d 555.

Liability of notary public or his bond for wilful or deliberate misconduct in performance of duties, 44 A.L.R.3d 1243.

Admissibility, in action against notary public, of evidence as to usual business practice of notary public of identifying person seeking certificate of acknowledgment, 59 A.L.R.3d 1327.

44-06.1-02.
Applicability.

The provisions of this chapter apply to notarial acts performed on or after the effective date of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3.

44-06.1-03.
Authority to perform notarial acts.

A notarial officer may perform notarial acts authorized by this chapter or by other law of this state.

A notarial officer may certify a tangible copy of an electronic record is an accurate copy of the electronic record. The prohibition under subdivision b of subsection 7 of section 44-06.1-23 does not apply to a tangible copy certified under this subsection.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3; 2019, ch. 376, § 3, effective August 1, 2019.

44-06.1-04.
Requirements for certain notarial acts.

A notarial officer who takes an acknowledgment of a record shall determine, from personal knowledge or satisfactory evidence of the identity of the individual, that the individual appearing before the officer and making the acknowledgment has the identity claimed and that the signature on the record is the signature of the individual.

A notarial officer who takes a verification of a statement on oath or affirmation shall determine, from personal knowledge or satisfactory evidence of the identity of the individual, that the individual appearing before the officer and making the verification has the identity claimed and that the signature on the statement verified is the signature of the individual.

A notarial officer who witnesses or attests to a signature shall determine, from personal knowledge or satisfactory evidence of the identity of the individual, that the individual appearing before the officer and signing the record has the identity claimed.

A notarial officer who certifies or attests a copy of a record or an item that was copied shall determine that the copy is a full, true, and accurate transcription or reproduction of the record or item.

A notarial officer who makes or notes a protest of a negotiable instrument shall determine the matters set forth in section 41-03-62.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3.

44-06.1-05.
Personal appearance required.

If a notarial act relates to a statement made in or a signature executed on a record, the individual making the statement or executing the signature shall appear personally before the notarial officer.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3.

44-06.1-06.
Identification of individual.

A notarial officer has personal knowledge of the identity of an individual appearing before the officer if the individual is personally known to the officer through dealings sufficient to provide reasonable certainty that the individual has the identity claimed.

A notarial officer has satisfactory evidence of the identity of an individual appearing before the officer if the officer can identify the individual:

By means of:

A passport, driver’s license, or government-issued nondriver identification card that is currently valid or expired not more than three years before performance of the notarial act; or

Another form of government identification issued to an individual that is currently valid or expired not more than three years before performance of the notarial act, contains the individual’s signature or a photograph of the individual, and is satisfactory to the officer; or

By a verification on oath or affirmation of a credible witness personally appearing before the officer and known to the officer or whom the officer can identify on the basis of a passport, driver’s license, or government-issued nondriver identification card that is currently valid or expired not more than three years before performance of the notarial act.

A notarial officer may require an individual to provide additional information or identification credentials necessary to assure the officer of the identity of the individual.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3.

44-06.1-07.
Authority to refuse to perform notarial act.

A notarial officer may refuse to perform a notarial act if the officer is not satisfied that:

The individual executing the record is competent or has the capacity to execute the record; or

The individual’s signature is knowingly and voluntarily made.

Except as prohibited by law other than the provisions of this chapter, a notarial officer may refuse to perform a notarial act.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3.

44-06.1-08.
Signature if individual unable to sign.

If an individual is physically unable to sign a record, the individual may direct an individual other than the notarial officer to sign the individual’s name on the record. The notarial officer shall insert “Signature affixed by (insert name of other individual) at the direction of (insert name of individual)” or words of similar import.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3.

44-06.1-09.
Notarial act in this state.

A notarial act may be performed in this state by the following individuals:

A notary public of this state;

A judge, clerk, or deputy clerk of any court of this state; or

Any other individual authorized to perform the specific act by the law of this state.

The signature and title of an individual performing a notarial act in this state are prima facie evidence that the signature is genuine and that the individual holds the designated title.

The signature and title of a notarial officer described in subdivision a or b of subsection 1 conclusively establish the authority of the officer to perform the notarial act.

A notarial act performed in this state by a notarial officer of a bordering state has the same effect as if the act were performed by a notarial officer of this state, if the bordering state grants notarial officers of this state similar authority within that state.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3; 2013, ch. 340, § 1.

44-06.1-10.
Notarial act in another state.

A notarial act performed in another state has the same effect under the law of this state as if performed by a notarial officer of this state, if the act performed in that state is performed by:

A notary public of that state;

A judge, clerk, or deputy clerk of a court of that state; or

Any other individual authorized by the law of that state to perform the notarial act.

The signature and title of an individual performing a notarial act in another state are prima facie evidence that the signature is genuine and that the individual holds the designated title.

The signature and title of a notarial officer described in subdivision a or b of subsection 1 conclusively establish the authority of the officer to perform the notarial act.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3.

44-06.1-11.
Notarial act under authority of tribe.

A notarial act performed under the authority and in the jurisdiction of a federally recognized American Indian tribe has the same effect as if performed by a notarial officer of this state, if the act performed in the jurisdiction of that tribe is performed by:

A notary public of that tribe;

A judge, clerk, or deputy clerk of a court of that tribe; or

Any other individual authorized by the law of that tribe to perform the notarial act.

The signature and title of an individual performing a notarial act under the authority of and in the jurisdiction of a federally recognized American Indian tribe are prima facie evidence that the signature is genuine and that the individual holds the designated title.

The signature and title of a notarial officer described in subdivision a or b of subsection 1 conclusively establish the authority of the officer to perform the notarial act.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3.

44-06.1-12.
Notarial act under federal authority.

A notarial act performed under federal law has the same effect under the law of this state as if performed by a notarial officer of this state, if the act performed under federal law is performed by:

A judge, clerk, or deputy clerk of a court;

An individual in military service or performing duties under the authority of military service who is authorized to perform notarial acts under federal law;

An individual designated a notarizing officer by the United States department of state for performing notarial acts overseas; or

Any other individual authorized by federal law to perform the notarial act.

The signature and title of an individual acting under federal authority and performing a notarial act are prima facie evidence that the signature is genuine and that the individual holds the designated title.

The signature and title of an officer described in subdivision a, b, or c of subsection 1 establish the authority of the officer to perform the notarial act.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3.

44-06.1-13.
Foreign notarial act.

In this section, “foreign state” means a government other than the United States, a state, or a federally recognized American Indian tribe.

If a notarial act is performed under authority and in the jurisdiction of a foreign state or constituent unit of the foreign state or is performed under the authority of a multinational or international governmental organization, the act has the same effect under the law of this state as if performed by a notarial officer of this state.

If the title of office and indication of authority to perform notarial acts in a foreign state appear in a digest of foreign law or in a list customarily used as a source for that information, the authority of an officer with that title to perform notarial acts is conclusively established.

The signature and official stamp of an individual holding an office described in subsection 3 are prima facie evidence that the signature is genuine and the individual holds the designated title.

An apostille in the form prescribed by the Hague Convention of October 5, 1961, and issued by a foreign state party to the Hague Convention conclusively establishes that the signature of the notarial officer is genuine and that the officer holds the indicated office.

A consular authentication issued by an individual designated by the United States department of state as a notarizing officer for performing notarial acts overseas and attached to the record with respect to which the notarial act is performed conclusively establishes that the signature of the notarial officer is genuine and that the officer holds the indicated office.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3.

44-06.1-13.1.
Notarial Act performed for remotely located individual.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Communication technology” means an electronic device or process that:

Allows a notary public and a remotely located individual to communicate with each other simultaneously by sight and sound; and

When necessary and consistent with other applicable law, facilitates communication with a remotely located individual who has a vision, hearing, or speech impairment.

“Foreign state” means a jurisdiction other than the United States, a state, or a federally recognized Indian tribe.

“Identity proofing” means a process or service by which a third person provides a notary public with a means to verify the identity of a remotely located individual by a review of personal information from public or private data sources.

“Outside the United States” means a location outside the geographic boundaries of the United States, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, and any territory, insular possession, or other location subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

“Remotely located individual” means an individual who is not in the physical presence of the notary public who performs a notarial act under subsection 3.

A remotely located individual may comply with section 44-06.1-05 by using communication technology to appear before a notary public.

A notary public located in this state may perform a notarial act using communication technology for a remotely located individual if:

The notary public:

Has personal knowledge under subsection 1 of section 44-06.1-06 of the identity of the individual;

Has satisfactory evidence of the identity of the remotely located individual by oath or affirmation from a credible witness appearing before the notary public under subsection 2 of section 44-06.1-06 or this section; or

Has obtained satisfactory evidence of the identity of the remotely located individual by using at least two different types of identity proofing;

The notary public is able reasonably to confirm that a record before the notary public is the same record in which the remotely located individual made a statement or on which the individual executed a signature;

The notary public, or a person acting on behalf of the notary public, creates an audiovisual recording of the performance of the notarial act; and

For a remotely located individual located outside the United States:

The record:

Is to be filed with or relates to a matter before a public official or court, governmental entity, or other entity subject to the jurisdiction of the United States; or

Involves property located in the territorial jurisdiction of the United States or involves a transaction substantially connected with the United States; and

The act of making the statement or signing the record is not prohibited by the foreign state in which the remotely located individual is located.

If a notarial act is performed under this section, the certificate of notarial act required by section 44-06.1-14 and the short-form certificate provided in section 44-06.1-19 must indicate the notarial act was performed using communication technology.

A short-form certificate provided in section 44-06.1-19 for a notarial act subject to this section is sufficient if it:

Complies with the rules adopted under subdivision a of subsection 8; or

Is in the form provided in section 44-06.1-19 and contains a statement substantially as follows: “This notarial act involved the use of communication technology.”

A notary public, a guardian, conservator, or agent of a notary public, or a personal representative of a deceased notary public shall retain the audiovisual recording created under subdivision c of subsection 3 or cause the recording to be retained by a repository designated by or on behalf of the person required to retain the recording. Unless a different period is required by rule adopted under subdivision d of subsection 8, the recording must be retained for a period of at least ten years after the recording is made.

Before a notary public performs the notary public’s initial notarial act under this section, the notary public must notify the secretary of state that the notary public will be performing notarial acts with respect to remotely located individuals and identify the technologies the notary public intends to use. If the secretary of state has established standards under subsection 8 and section 44-06.1-25 for approval of communication technology or identity proofing, the communication technology and identity proofing must conform to the standards.

In addition to adopting rules under section 44-06.1-25, the secretary of state may adopt rules under this section regarding performance of a notarial act. The rules may:

Prescribe the means of performing a notarial act involving a remotely located individual using communication technology;

Establish standards for communication technology and identity proofing;

Establish requirements or procedures to approve providers of communication technology and the process of identity proofing; and

Establish standards and a period for the retention of an audiovisual recording created under subdivision c of subsection 3.

Before adopting, amending, or repealing a rule governing performance of a notarial act with respect to a remotely located individual, the secretary of state shall consider:

The most recent standards regarding the performance of a notarial act with respect to a remotely located individual promulgated by national standard-setting organizations and the recommendations of the national association of secretaries of state;

Standards, practices, and customs of other jurisdictions that have laws substantially similar to this section; and

The views of governmental officials and entities and other interested persons.

By allowing its communication technology or identity proofing to facilitate a notarial act for a remotely located individual or by providing storage of the audiovisual recording created under subdivision c of subsection 3, the provider of the communication technology, identity proofing, or storage appoints the secretary of state as the provider’s agent for service of process in any civil action in this state related to the notarial act.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 376, § 4, effective August 1, 2019.

44-06.1-14.
Certificate of notarial act.

A notarial act must be evidenced by a certificate. The certificate must:

Be executed contemporaneously with the performance of the notarial act;

Be signed and dated by the notarial officer and, if the notarial officer is a notary public, be signed in the same manner as on file with the secretary of state;

Identify the jurisdiction in which the notarial act is performed;

Contain the title of office of the notarial officer; and

Indicate the date of expiration, if any, of the notarial officer’s commission, if the officer is a notary public.

If a notarial act is performed by a notary public regarding a tangible record, the notary public’s official stamp must be affixed to the certificate. If a notarial act is performed by a notarial officer, other than a notary public, regarding a tangible record and the certificate contains the information specified in subdivisions b, c, and d of subsection 1, an official stamp may be affixed to the certificate. If the notarial act is performed by a notarial officer regarding an electronic record and the certificate contains the information specified in subdivisions b, c, and d of subsection 1, an official stamp may be attached to or logically associated with the certificate.

A certificate of a notarial act is sufficient if it meets the requirements of subsections 1 and 2 and:

Is in a short form set forth in section 44-06.1-19;

Is in a form otherwise permitted by the law of this state;

Is in a form permitted by the law applicable in the jurisdiction in which the notarial act was performed; or

Sets forth the actions of the notarial officer and the actions are sufficient to meet the requirements of the notarial act as provided in sections 44-06.1-04, 44-06.1-05, and 44-06.1-06 or other law.

By executing a certificate of a notarial act, a notarial officer certifies that the officer has complied with the requirements and made the determinations specified in sections 44-06.1-04, 44-06.1-05, and 44-06.1-06.

A notarial officer may not affix the officer’s signature to, or logically associate it with, a certificate until the notarial act has been performed.

If a notarial act is performed regarding a tangible record, a certificate must be part of, or securely attached to, the record. If a notarial act is performed regarding an electronic record, the certificate must be affixed to, or logically associated with, the electronic record. If the secretary of state has established standards pursuant to section 44-06.1-25 for attaching, affixing, or logically associating the certificate, the process must conform to the standards.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3.

44-06.1-15.
Official stamp.

The official stamp of a notary public must:

Include the notary public’s name, jurisdiction, commission expiration date, and other information required under section 44-06.1-16 or by the secretary of state; and

Be capable of being copied together with the record to which it is affixed or attached or with which it is logically associated.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3.

44-06.1-16.
Stamping device.

The secretary of state, upon receipt of the proper fee, oath, and bond, shall issue a certificate of authorization with which the notary public may obtain an official notary stamping device. A notary stamp vendor may provide a notary with an official stamping device only upon presentation by the notary of a certificate of authorization. The notary public shall place an impression of the notary’s stamp on the certificate of authorization and return the certificate of authorization to the secretary of state. After the certificate of authorization is received, approved, and filed, the secretary of state shall issue a notary commission that authorizes the notary to commence the duties of the office of notary public. A notary being commissioned must obtain a stamping device approved by the secretary of state which must be designed to leave a clear impression, be photographically reproducible, include the words “State of North Dakota” and “Notary Public”, contain the name and commission expiration date of the notary public exactly as shown on the notary’s commission, and which may not contain any other words, numbers, symbols, or a reproduction of the great seal of the state. All notary stamps must be surrounded by a border and, except as otherwise permitted by the secretary of state, may be up to or equal to one and five-eighths inch [41.28 millimeters] in diameter or if of a rectangular design, may be up to or equal to seven-eighths inch [22.23 millimeters] vertically by two and five-eighths inches [66.68 millimeters] horizontally.

A notary public is responsible for the security of the notary public’s stamping device and may not allow another individual to use the device to perform a notarial act. On resignation from, or the revocation or expiration of, the notary public’s commission, or on the expiration of the date set forth in the stamping device, if any, the notary public shall disable the stamping device by destroying, defacing, damaging, erasing, or securing it against use in a manner that renders it unusable. On the death or adjudication of incompetency of a notary public, the notary public’s personal representative or guardian or any other individual knowingly in possession of the stamping device shall render it unusable by destroying, defacing, damaging, erasing, or securing it against use in a manner that renders it unusable.

If a notary public’s stamping device is lost or stolen, the notary public or the notary public’s personal representative or guardian shall notify promptly the secretary of state on discovering that the device is lost or stolen.

An official stamping device is the property of the notary only and may not be retained or used by any other person, including an employer of a notary even if the employer purchased or paid for the notary’s stamping device. An official stamping device must remain in the direct and exclusive control of the notary at all times during a notary’s commission.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3; 2013, ch. 340, § 2.

44-06.1-16.1
Journals.

A notary public shall maintain a journal in which the notary public chronicles all notarial acts the notary public performs with respect to a remotely located individual under section 44-06.1-13.1. The notary public shall retain the journal for ten years after the performance of the last notarial act chronicled in the journal.

A journal may be created on a tangible medium or in an electronic format. A notary public shall maintain only one journal at a time to chronicle all notarial acts performed regarding tangible records and one or more journals to chronicle all notarial acts performed regarding electronic records. If a journal is maintained on a tangible medium, it must be a permanent, bound register with numbered pages. If the journal is maintained in an electronic format, it must be in a permanent, tamper-evident electronic format complying with the rules of the secretary of state.

An entry in a journal must be made contemporaneously with performance of the notarial act and contain the following information:

The date and time of the notarial act;

A description of the record, if any, and type of notarial act;

The full name and address of each individual for whom the notarial act is performed;

If identity of the individual is based on personal knowledge, a statement to that effect;

If identity of the individual is based on satisfactory evidence, a brief description of the method of identification and the identification credential presented, if any, including the date of issuance and expiration of the identification credential; and

The fee, if any, charged by the notary public.

If the journal of a notary public is lost, the notary public loses access to the journal, or the journal is stolen, the notary public promptly shall notify the secretary of state upon discovering the journal is lost, access is lost, or the journal is stolen.

On resignation from, or the revocation or suspension of, the commission of a notary public, the notary public shall retain the journal in accordance with subsection 1 of this section and inform the secretary of state where the journal is located.

Instead of retaining a journal as provided in subsections 1 and 5, a current or former notary public may transmit the journal to a repository approved by the secretary of state.

Upon the death or adjudication of incompetency of a current or former notary public, the personal representative or guardian of the notary public shall retain the journal as provided in subsections 1 and 5 or transmit the journal to a repository approved by the secretary of state.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 376, § 6, effective August 1, 2019.

44-06.1-17.
Notary vacancies — Resignations.

Whenever the office of any notary public becomes vacant, the stamping device must be destroyed as provided in section 44-06.1-16. If a notary public resigns the notary’s commission, the notary shall notify the secretary of state within thirty days of the resignation, and shall indicate the effective date of the resignation.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3; 2017, ch. 313, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

44-06.1-18.
Notification regarding performance of notarial acts on electronic record — Selection of technology — Acceptance of tangible copy of electronic record.

A notary public may select one or more tamper-evident technologies to perform notarial acts with respect to electronic records. An individual may not require a notary public to perform a notarial act with respect to an electronic record with a technology that the notary public has not selected.

Before a notary public performs the notary public’s initial notarial act with respect to an electronic record, a notary public shall notify the secretary of state that the notary public will be performing notarial acts with respect to electronic records and identify the technology the notary public intends to use. If the secretary of state has established standards for approval of technology pursuant to section 44-06.1-25, the technology must conform to the standards. If the technology conforms to the standards, the secretary of state shall approve the use of the technology.

A recorder shall accept for recording a tangible copy of an electronic record containing a notarial certificate as satisfying any requirement that a record accepted for recording be an original, if the notarial officer executing the notarial certificate certifies the tangible copy is an accurate copy of the electronic record.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3; 2019, ch. 376, § 5, effective August 1, 2019.

44-06.1-19.
Short form.

The following short form certificates of notarial acts are sufficient for the purposes indicated, if completed with the information required by subsections 1 and 2 of section 44-06.1-14:

For an acknowledgment in an individual capacity:

For an acknowledgment in a representative capacity:

For a verification on oath or affirmation:

For witnessing or attesting a signature:

For certifying a copy of a record:

State of [County] of This record was acknowledged before me on by Date Name(s) of individual(s) Signature of notarial officer Stamp [] Title of office [My commission expires: .]

Click to view

State of [County] of This record was acknowledged before me on by Date Name(s) of individual(s) (type of authority, such as officer or trustee) of (name of party on behalf of whom record was executed). Signature of notarial officer Stamp [] Title of office [My commission expires: .]

Click to view

State of [County] of Signed and sworn to (or affirmed) before me on by Date Name(s) of individual(s) making statement Signature of notarial officer Stamp[] Title of office [My commission expires: .]

Click to view

State of [County] of Signed [or attested] before me on by Date Name(s) of individual(s) Signature of notarial officer Stamp [] Title of office [My commission expires: .]

Click to view

State of [County] of I certify that this is a true and correct copy of a record in the possession of . Dated Signature of notarial officer Stamp [] Title of office [My commission expires: .]

Click to view

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3.

44-06.1-20.
Notary public commission — Qualifications.

An individual qualified under subsection 2 may apply to the secretary of state for a commission as a notary public. The applicant shall comply with and provide the information required by the secretary of state and submit the required application fee of thirty-six dollars.

An applicant for a commission as a notary public must:

Be at least eighteen years of age;

Be a citizen or permanent legal resident of the United States;

Be a resident of or have a place of employment or practice in this state or must reside in a county that borders this state and which is in a state that extends reciprocity to a notary public who resides in a border county of this state. If the person resides in a county bordering this state, that person by applying for a commission in this state appoints the secretary of state as the agent for service of process, for all purposes relating to notarial acts, including the receipt of correspondence relating to notarial acts;

Be able to read and write English; and

Not be disqualified to receive a commission under section 44-06.1-21.

Before issuance of a commission as a notary public, an applicant for the commission shall execute an oath of office and submit it to the secretary of state.

Before issuance of a commission as a notary public, the applicant for a commission shall submit to the secretary of state an assurance in the form of a surety bond or its functional equivalent in the amount of seven thousand five hundred dollars and is subject to approval by the secretary of state. The assurance must be issued by a surety or other entity licensed or authorized to do business in this state. The assurance must cover acts performed during the term of the notary public’s commission and must be in the form prescribed by the secretary of state. If a notary public violates law with respect to notaries public in this state, the surety or issuing entity is liable under the assurance. The surety or issuing entity shall give thirty days’ notice to the secretary of state before canceling the assurance. The surety or issuing entity shall notify the secretary of state not later than thirty days after making a payment to a claimant under the assurance. A notary public may perform notarial acts in this state only during the period that a valid assurance is on file with the secretary of state.

On compliance with subsections 1, 2, 3, and 4, the secretary of state shall issue a notary public commission to an applicant for a term of four years, unless sooner removed by the secretary of state. The notary shall post the commission in a conspicuous place in the notary’s office or place of employment.

A commission to act as a notary public authorizes the notary public to perform notarial acts. The commission does not provide a notary public any immunities or benefits conferred by law of this state on public officials or employees.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a notary public may perform any notarial act as defined in section 44-06.1-01 outside the state as provided in section 47-19-55.

The secretary of state shall notify each notary public at least thirty days before the expiration of the notary public’s term of the date upon which the notary public’s commission will expire. The notice must be addressed to the notary public at the last-known place of residence.

Each notary public issued a commission shall notify the secretary of state in writing within sixty days of any change of address.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3; 2017, ch. 313, § 3, effective August 1, 2017.